Louisiana, session 2026, SB258.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
5 Section 1. Children's Code Art. 951.1 is hereby enacted to read as follows:
6 Art. 951.1. Definitions
7 As used in this Title, "child" means any person under the age of twenty-
8 one, including an emancipated minor, who commits a traffic violation before
9 attaining seventeen years of age.
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 1 of 1
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.